Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.140

Director to establish systems within market areas.

(1) The director shall establish a system of classifying, pricing, and pooling of all milk used in each market area established under RCW 15.35.110.

(2) Thereafter the director may establish a system in each market area for the equalization of returns for all quota milk and all surplus over quota milk whereby all producers selling milk to milk dealers or delivering milk in such market area, or their cooperative associations, will receive the same prices for all quota milk and all surplus over quota milk, except that any premium paid to a producer by a dealer above established prices shall not be considered in determining average pool prices. Such prices may reflect adjustments based on the value of component parts of each producer's milk.

[ 1991 c 239 s 10; 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 14.]